pt-PT: Material do forro da cilha: Feltro; Polar; Gel; Espuma viscoelástica; Mohair; Neopreno; Pele de ovelha; Polar sintético; Lã; Outro
fr: Matériau de la doublure de sangle: Feutre; Polaire; Gel; Mousse à mémoire de forme; Mohair; Néoprène; Peau de mouton; Polaire synthétique; Laine; Autre
it: Materiale della fodera con coulisse: Feltro; Pile; Gel; Memory foam; Mohair; Neoprene; Pelle di pecora; Pile sintetico; Lana; Altro
ko: 신치 라이너 소재: 펠트; 플리스; 젤; 메모리 폼; 모헤어; 네오프렌; 양가죽; 합성 플리스; 울; 기타
es: Material del forro ajustable: Fieltro; Vellón; Gel; Espuma viscoelástica; Mohair; Neopreno; Piel de oveja; Vellón sintético; Lana; Otro
pl: Materiał podszycia popręgu: Filc; Polar; Żel; Pianka z pamięcią kształtu; Moher; Neopren; Skóra owcza; Polar syntetyczny; Wełna; Inny
lt-LT: Pavaržos pamušalo medžiaga: Veltinis; Flisas; Gelis; Viskoelastinis porolonas; Mohera; Neoprenas; Avikailis; Sintetinis flisas; Vilna; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на вътрешната подплата със стягаща система: Филц; Полар; Гел; Мемори пяна; Мохер; Неопрен; Овча кожа; Синтетичен полар; Вълна; Друго
ja: シンチライナー素材: フェルト; フリース; ジェル; メモリーフォーム; モヘア; ネオプレン; シープスキン; 合成フリース; ウール; その他
cs: Materiál podšívky podbřišníku: Plsť; Fleece; Gel; Paměťová pěna; Mohér; Neopren; Ovčí kůže; Syntetický fleece; Vlna; Jiné
tr: Karın kayışı astar malzemesi: Keçe; Polar; Jel; Hafızalı sünger; Tiftik; Neopren; Koyun postu; Sentetik polar; Yün; Diğer
fi: Satulavyön vuorausmateriaali: Huopa; Fleece; Geeli; Muistivaahto; Mohair; Neopreeni; Lampaantalja; Synteettinen fleece; Villa; Muu
vi: Chất liệu lót đai: Nỉ; Lông cừu; Gel; Mút hoạt tính; Mohair; Neoprene; Da cừu; Lông cừu tổng hợp; Len; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal podloške za kolan: Filc; Flis; Gel; Memorijska pjena; Moher; Neopren; Ovčja koža; Sintetički flis; Vuna; Ostalo
sv: Gjordfodrets material: Filt; Fleece; Gel; Minnesskum; Mohair; Neopren; Fårskinn; Syntetisk fleece; Ull; Annat
sl-SI: Material za podlogo zategovalnih pasov: Klobučevina; Flis; Gel; Spominska pena; Moher; Neopren; Ovčja koža; Sintetični flis; Volna; Drugo
hu: Cinch bélés anyaga: Filc; Polár; Zselé; Memóriahab; Moher; Neoprén; Báránybőr; Szintetikus polár; Gyapjú; Egyéb
el: Υλικό επένδυσης cinch: Τσόχα; Φλις; Τζελ; Αφρός μνήμης; Μοχέρ; Νεοπρένιο; Προβιά; Συνθετικό φλις; Μαλλί; Άλλο
zh-CN: 肚带衬垫材料: 毛毡; 抓绒; 凝胶; 记忆棉; 马海毛; 氯丁橡胶; 羊皮; 合成抓绒; 羊毛; 其他
ru: Материал подкладки подпруги: Войлок; Флис; Гель; Пена с эффектом памяти; Мохер; Неопрен; Овчина; Синтетический флис; Шерсть; Другой
zh-TW: 馬肚帶襯墊材質: 毛氈; 刷毛; 凝膠; 記憶海綿; 馬海毛; 氯丁橡膠; 羊皮; 合成刷毛; 羊毛; 其他
nl: Singelvoering materiaal: Vilt; Fleece; Gel; Traagschuim; Mohair; Neopreen; Schapenvacht; Synthetische fleece; Wol; Anders
en: Cinch liner material: Felt; Fleece; Gel; Memory foam; Mohair; Neoprene; Sheepskin; Synthetic fleece; Wool; Other
nb: Cinch-fôrmateriale: Filt; Fleece; Gel; Minneskum; Mohair; Neopren; Saueskinn; Syntetisk fleece; Ull; Annet
da: Cinch-foringsmateriale: Filt; Fleece; Gel; Memoryskum; Mohair; Neopren; Fåreskind; Syntetisk fleece; Uld; Andet
pt-BR: Material do forro da cilha: Feltro; Fleece; Gel; Espuma viscoelástica; Mohair; Neoprene; Pele de carneiro; Fleece sintético; Lã; Outro
th: วัสดุซับในของสายรัด: สักหลาด; ฟลีซ; เจล; เมมโมรี่โฟม; โมแฮร์; นีโอพรีน; หนังแกะ; ฟลีซสังเคราะห์; ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál podšívky podbrušníka: Plsť; Flís; Gél; Pamäťová pena; Mohér; Neoprén; Ovčia koža; Syntetický flís; Vlna; Iné
ro-RO: Materialul căptușelii chingii: Pâslă; Fleece; Gel; Spumă cu memorie; Mohair; Neopren; Piele de oaie; Fleece sintetic; Lână; Altele
de: Material des Cinch-Futters: Filz; Fleece; Gel; Memory-Schaum; Mohair; Neopren; Schaffell; Synthetisches Fleece; Wolle; Sonstige